Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.110

Sheriff not to practice law.

No sheriff shall appear or practice as attorney in any court, except in their own defense.

[ 1992 c 225 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.28.110. Prior: 1891 c 45 s 4, part; Code 1881 s 2770, part; 1863 p 558 s 5, part; 1854 p 434 s 5, part; RRS s 4171, part.]